src-fst-morphology-root.lexc.md
## Flag diacritics
We have manually optimised the structure of our lexicon using following
flag diacritics to restrict morhpological combinatorics - only allow compounds
with verbs if the verb is further derived into a noun again:
|  **@P.NeedNoun.ON@** | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised
|  **@D.NeedNoun.ON@** | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised
|  **@C.NeedNoun@** | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised

For languages that allow compounding, the following flag diacritics are needed
to control position-based compounding restrictions for nominals. Their use is
handled automatically if combined with +CmpN/xxx tags. If not used, they will
do no harm.
|  **@P.CmpFrst.FALSE@** | Require that words tagged as such only appear first
|  **@D.CmpPref.TRUE@** | Block such words from entering ENDLEX
|  **@P.CmpPref.FALSE@** | Block these words from making further compounds
|  **@D.CmpLast.TRUE@** | Block such words from entering R
|  **@D.CmpNone.TRUE@** | Combines with the next tag to prohibit compounding
|  **@U.CmpNone.FALSE@** | Combines with the prev tag to prohibit compounding
|  **@P.CmpOnly.TRUE@** | Sets a flag to indicate that the word has passed R
|  **@D.CmpOnly.FALSE@** | Disallow words coming directly from root.

Use the following flag diacritics to control downcasing of derived proper
nouns (e.g. Finnish Pariisi -> pariisilainen). See e.g. North Sámi for how to use
these flags. There exists a ready-made regex that will do the actual down-casing
given the proper use of these flags.
|  **@U.Cap.Obl@** | Allowing downcasing of derived names: deatnulasj.
|  **@U.Cap.Opt@** | Allowing downcasing of derived names: deatnulasj.

Flags used to identify parts of speech

# FLAGS USED WITH NUMERALS
cardinal vs ordinal
* @U.NUM-TYPE.CARD@
* @U.NUM-TYPE.ORD@
* @R.NUM-TYPE.ORD@
* @D.NUM-TYPE.ORD@
* @U.NUM-YKSI.YES@ Allows for yksitostu
* @D.NUM-YKSI.YES@ disallows yksisada
* @U.NUM-CARD.WAS@
* @R.NUM-CARD.WAS@
* @D.NUM-CARD.WAS@
## number
* @U.DECL-NX.SG@
* @U.DECL-NX.SP@
* @U.DECL-NX.PL@
* @R.DECL-NX.SG@
* @R.DECL-NX.SP@
* @R.DECL-NX.PL@
## case

Orthographical errors? 2021-03-13
* @R.ErrOrth.ON@
* @C.ErrOrth@
* @D.ErrOrth.ON@ earlier undeclared
* @P.ErrOrth.ON@ earlier undeclared 2024-05-16

Pmatch 2021-03-13

Removal
* @C.DECL-NX@
* @C.DECL-CX@
* **@C.NUM-TYPE@** 

| Flag diacritic | Explanation
| :------------- |:-----------
| @U.number.one@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.two@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.three@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.four@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.five@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.six@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.seven@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.eight@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.nine@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.zero@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @P.number.one@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @P.number.two@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @P.number.three@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @P.number.four@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @P.number.five@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @P.number.six@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @P.number.seven@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @P.number.eight@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @P.number.nine@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @P.number.ten@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
|  @P.number.zero@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;

# Lexicon Root

* adjectives ;
* adpositions ;
* adverbs ;
* conjunctors ;
* determiners ;
* interjections ;
* nouns ;
* pronouns ;
* propernouns ;
* propernouns-toponyms ;
* quantifiers ;
* verbs ;
* **rus-Cyrl-2-Lat-ProperNouns ;** Derived from urj-Cyrl
* Exceptions ;

NEWWORDS FILES
**A_NEWWORDS ;** adjectives
**ADV_NEWWORDS ;** adverbs
**N_NEWWORDS ;** nouns
**PROP_NEWWORDS ;** proper nouns
**V_NEWWORDS ;** verbs

I INCLUDE SOME SMALL LEXICA HERE
WAITING FOR OWN FILES, OR PERHAPS THEY COULD STAY HERE

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/root.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-olo/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/root.lexc)</small>
